tools/nvda/louis/tables/ja-kantenji-ucs2.utb
sign 福 12375-2375-27458
sign 禛 12375-2-2374568
sign 竑 12768-3-3456
sign 竧 12768-23768-24
sign 靖 12768-2768-234568
sign 竫 12768-3568-346
sign 箞 12376-2358-2468
sign 精 1375-375-234568
sign 絈 123-378-24
sign 絜 137-5-2745
sign 綷 123-35-3456
sign 綠 12368-2368-237468
sign 緖 137-37-3748
sign 繒 123-7-34568
sign 罇 1768-23568-23468
sign 羡 13568-568-7468
sign 羽 127568-27568-34
sign 茁 1258-56-237458
sign 荢 1258-36-248
sign 荿 1258-23568-23748
sign 菇 1258-2356-3456
sign 菶 1258-2358-37458
sign 葈 1258-78-2348
sign 蒴 1258-26-2748
sign 蕓 1258-2376-2345
sign 蕙 1368-27568-3468
sign 蕫 1258-2768-2346
sign 薰 1258-258-74568
sign 﨡 127568-23568-234
sign 蠇 127568-468
sign 裵 12375-36-74568
sign 訒 1235-2-2745
sign 訷 1235-6-23468
sign 詹 18-3748
sign 誧 1376-8-37458
sign 誾 137568-36-2345
sign 諟 1235-378-7456
sign 諸 1376-376-3748
sign 諶 1235-2-2348
sign 譓 1235-27568-3468
sign 譿 1235-25-23458
sign 賰 176-2358-3748
sign 賴 135-35-468
sign 贒 176-5-24568
sign 赶 1278-5-248
sign 﨣 1278-56-37456
sign 軏 136-36-274568
sign 﨤 12378-5-374
sign 逸 1278-278-346
sign 遧 12378-2768-3456
sign 郞 175-75-2468
sign 都 1268-268-2468
sign 鄕 137-36-745
sign 鄧 1268-2568-37456
sign 釚 128-68-345
sign 釗 128-25-2745
sign 釗 128-25-2745
sign 釞 128-56-274
sign 釭 128-358-24
sign 釮 128-356-45
sign 釤 128-78-245
sign 釥 128-78-34568
sign 鈆 128-25-3458
sign 鈐 128-236-24
sign 鈊 128-3468
sign 鈺 128-237458
sign 鉀 128-68-3458
sign 鈼 128-8-2468
sign 鉎 128-23568-234
sign 鉙 128-2356-2748
sign 鉑 128-378-24
sign 鈹 128-5-23748
sign 鉧 128-56-2748
sign 銧 128-78-34
sign 鉷 128-5-3458
sign 鉸 128-78-23746
sign 鋧 128-237568-346
sign 鋗 126-36-248
sign 鋙 128-26-23456
sign 鋐 128-36-274568
sign 鋕 128-2756-3468
sign 鋠 128-5-3456
sign 鋓 128-375-2745
sign 錥 128-78-246
sign 錡 128-2358-248
sign 鋻 128-5-3746
sign 﨨 128-2756-248
sign 錞 128-78-3458
sign 鋿 128-8-2748
sign 錝 128-25-23745
sign 錂 128-8-24568
sign 鍰 128-6-458
sign 鍗 128-2768-23468
sign 鎤 128-78-3748
sign 鏆 128-56-27456
sign 鏞 128-756-37468
sign 鏸 128-27568-3468
sign 鐱 128-8-2346
sign 鑅 128-78-2348
sign 鑈 128-3768-2374568
sign 閒 137568-246
sign 隆 1268-268-234568
sign 﨩 1268-23568-745
sign 隝 1268-78-234568
sign 隯 1268-78-237458
sign 霳 12376-268-234568
sign 霻 12376-276-37456
sign 靃 12376-234
sign 靍 12376-78-234568
sign 靏 12376-56-234568
sign 靑 12368-2368-234568
sign 靕 1768-2368-234568
sign 顗 135-6-745
sign 顥 135-378-23456
sign 飯 123568-23568-7468
sign 飼 123568-23568-458
sign 餧 123568-375-27458
sign 館 123568-23568-246
sign 馞 1375-78-3456
sign 驎 13568-375-34
sign 髙 12-56-2345
sign 髜 1235-378-2458
sign 魵 123568-36-2346
sign 魲 123568-25-37456
sign 鮏 123568-36-234
sign 鮱 123568-3756-34
sign 鮻 123568-3-274568
sign 鰀 123568-6-458
sign 鵰 12756-25-234568
sign 鵫 1378-36-234568
sign 鶴 156-56-234568
sign 鸙 1256-78-234568
sign 黑 12368-2368-2458
sign 褱 12-2456
sign 嗃 12356-36-2345
sign 吡 12356-36-456
sign 婞 12578-2567-248
sign 鋮 128-23568-23478
sign \x525d 235678-235678-235678 # I'm not sure this kanji is assigned 
#end Kanji

#begin character class rules
attribute katakana アイウエオカガキギクグケゲコゴサザシジスズセゼソゾタダチヂッツヅテデトドナニヌネノハバパヒビピフブプヘベペホボポマミムメモヤユヨラリルレロヮワヰヱヲンヴーヵヶァィゥェォャュョ
attribute hiragana あいうえおかきくけこさしすせそたちつてとなにぬねのはひふへほまみむめもやゆよらいるれろわをんがぎぐげござじずぜぞだぢづでどばびぶべぼぱぴぷぺぽっ
attribute alphabet abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZａｂｃｄｅｆｇｈｉｊｋｌｍｎｏｐｑｒｓｔｕｖｗｘｙｚＡＢＣＤＥＦＧＨＩＪＫＬＭＮＯＰＱＲＳＴＵＶＷＸＹＺ
attribute loweralphabet abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzａｂｃｄｅｆｇｈｉｊｋｌｍｎｏｐｑｒｓｔｕｖｗｘｙｚ
attribute alphanum 1234567890１２３４５６７８９０abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZａｂｃｄｅｆｇｈｉｊｋｌｍｎｏｐｑｒｓｔｕｖｗｘｙｚＡＢＣＤＥＦＧＨＩＪＫＬＭＮＯＰＱＲＳＴＵＶＷＸＹＺ
attribute upperkantenji 糸家言頁月分性口十比宿亜参丸褱巤元維繰絵紣絹縮今倉会含唖唯品唁額吟唸単古兄味雄賑有唇才克韓售噪囂嗃叶吡寥褱与写上中高首甘宙離計君絡官卒顔誰憧寮論雌説彙頒頑惰寂惨紛悟悦窃客壱完究里丼凸穴膨

#begin Katakana rules
# Katakana characters are indicated with Katakana opening dots367 and closing dots37.
# Some Katakana combinations cannot be properly indicated.
# For example, after small Katakana "ァィゥェオャュョ"
# because they are defined with "always".
noback context `["ー"]%space @367-36-37
noback context `["ー"]%hiragana @367-36-37

noback context `["ア"]%space @367-2-37
noback context `["イ"]%space @367-23-37
noback context `["ウ"]%space @367-25-37
noback context `["エ"]%space @367-235-37
noback context `["オ"]%space @367-35-37
noback context `["カ"]%space @367-28-37
noback context `["キ"]%space @367-238-37
noback context `["ク"]%space @367-258-37
noback context `["ケ"]%space @367-2358-37
noback context `["コ"]%space @367-358-37
noback context `["ガ"]%space @367-6-28-37
noback context `["ギ"]%space @367-6-238-37
noback context `["グ"]%space @367-6-258-37
noback context `["ゲ"]%space @367-6-2358-37
noback context `["ゴ"]%space @367-6-358-37

noback context `["サ"]%space @367-268-37
noback context `["シ"]%space @367-2368-37
noback context `["ス"]%space @367-2568-37
noback context `["セ"]%space @367-23568-37
noback context `["ソ"]%space @367-3568-37
noback context `["ザ"]%space @367-6-268-37
noback context `["ジ"]%space @367-6-2368-37
noback context `["ズ"]%space @367-6-2568-37
noback context `["ゼ"]%space @367-6-23568-37
noback context `["ゾ"]%space @367-6-3568-37

noback context `["タ"]%space @367-267-37
noback context `["チ"]%space @367-2367-37
noback context `["ツ"]%space @367-2567-37
noback context `["テ"]%space @367-23567-37
noback context `["ト"]%space @367-3567-37
noback context `["ダ"]%space @367-6-267-37
noback context `["ヂ"]%space @367-6-2367-37
noback context `["ヅ"]%space @367-6-2567-37
noback context `["デ"]%space @367-6-23567-37
noback context `["ド"]%space @367-6-3567-37

noback context `["ナ"]%space @367-27-37
noback context `["ニ"]%space @367-237-37
noback context `["ヌ"]%space @367-257-37
noback context `["ネ"]%space @367-2357-37
noback context `["ノ"]%space @367-357-37

noback context `["ハ"]%space @367-278-37
noback context `["ヒ"]%space @367-2378-37
noback context `["フ"]%space @367-2578-37
noback context `["ヘ"]%space @367-23578-37
noback context `["ホ"]%space @367-3578-37
noback context `["バ"]%space @367-6-278-37
noback context `["ビ"]%space @367-6-2378-37
noback context `["ブ"]%space @367-6-2578-37
noback context `["ベ"]%space @367-6-23578-37
noback context `["ボ"]%space @367-6-3578-37
noback context `["パ"]%space @367-8-278-37
noback context `["ピ"]%space @367-8-2378-37
noback context `["プ"]%space @367-8-2578-37
noback context `["ペ"]%space @367-8-23578-37
noback context `["ポ"]%space @367-8-3578-37

noback context `["マ"]%space @367-2678-37
noback context `["ミ"]%space @367-23678-37
noback context `["ム"]%space @367-25678-37
noback context `["メ"]%space @367-235678-37
noback context `["モ"]%space @367-35678-37

noback context `["ヤ"]%space @367-57-37
noback context `["ユ"]%space @367-578-37
noback context `["ヨ"]%space @367-567-37

noback context `["ラ"]%space @367-26-37
noback context `["リ"]%space @367-236-37
noback context `["ル"]%space @367-256-37
noback context `["レ"]%space @367-2356-37
noback context `["ロ"]%space @367-356-37

noback context `["ワ"]%space @367-7-37
noback context `["ヲ"]%space @367-67-37
noback context `["ン"]%space @367-678-37

noback context `["ア"]%hiragana @367-2-37
noback context `["イ"]%hiragana @367-23-37
noback context `["ウ"]%hiragana @367-25-37
noback context `["エ"]%hiragana @367-235-37
noback context `["オ"]%hiragana @367-35-37
noback context `["カ"]%hiragana @367-28-37
noback context `["キ"]%hiragana @367-238-37
noback context `["ク"]%hiragana @367-258-37
noback context `["ケ"]%hiragana @367-2358-37
noback context `["コ"]%hiragana @367-358-37
noback context `["ガ"]%hiragana @367-6-28-37
noback context `["ギ"]%hiragana @367-6-238-37
noback context `["グ"]%hiragana @367-6-258-37
noback context `["ゲ"]%hiragana @367-6-2358-37
noback context `["ゴ"]%hiragana @367-6-358-37

noback context `["サ"]%hiragana @367-268-37
noback context `["シ"]%hiragana @367-2368-37
noback context `["ス"]%hiragana @367-2568-37
noback context `["セ"]%hiragana @367-23568-37
noback context `["ソ"]%hiragana @367-3568-37
noback context `["ザ"]%hiragana @367-6-268-37
noback context `["ジ"]%hiragana @367-6-2368-37
noback context `["ズ"]%hiragana @367-6-2568-37
noback context `["ゼ"]%hiragana @367-6-23568-37
noback context `["ゾ"]%hiragana @367-6-3568-37

noback context `["タ"]%hiragana @367-267-37
noback context `["チ"]%hiragana @367-2367-37
noback context `["ツ"]%hiragana @367-2567-37
noback context `["テ"]%hiragana @367-23567-37
noback context `["ト"]%hiragana @367-3567-37
noback context `["ダ"]%hiragana @367-6-267-37
noback context `["ヂ"]%hiragana @367-6-2367-37
noback context `["ヅ"]%hiragana @367-6-2567-37
noback context `["デ"]%hiragana @367-6-23567-37
noback context `["ド"]%hiragana @367-6-3567-37

noback context `["ナ"]%hiragana @367-27-37
noback context `["ニ"]%hiragana @367-237-37
noback context `["ヌ"]%hiragana @367-257-37
noback context `["ネ"]%hiragana @367-2357-37
noback context `["ノ"]%hiragana @367-357-37

noback context `["ハ"]%hiragana @367-278-37
noback context `["ヒ"]%hiragana @367-2378-37
noback context `["フ"]%hiragana @367-2578-37
noback context `["ヘ"]%hiragana @367-23578-37
noback context `["ホ"]%hiragana @367-3578-37
noback context `["バ"]%hiragana @367-6-278-37
noback context `["ビ"]%hiragana @367-6-2378-37
noback context `["ブ"]%hiragana @367-6-2578-37
noback context `["ベ"]%hiragana @367-6-23578-37
noback context `["ボ"]%hiragana @367-6-3578-37
noback context `["パ"]%hiragana @367-8-278-37
noback context `["ピ"]%hiragana @367-8-2378-37
noback context `["プ"]%hiragana @367-8-2578-37
noback context `["ペ"]%hiragana @367-8-23578-37
noback context `["ポ"]%hiragana @367-8-3578-37

noback context `["マ"]%hiragana @367-2678-37
noback context `["ミ"]%hiragana @367-23678-37
noback context `["ム"]%hiragana @367-25678-37
noback context `["メ"]%hiragana @367-235678-37
noback context `["モ"]%hiragana @367-35678-37

noback context `["ヤ"]%hiragana @367-57-37
noback context `["ユ"]%hiragana @367-578-37
noback context `["ヨ"]%hiragana @367-567-37

noback context `["ラ"]%hiragana @367-26-37
noback context `["リ"]%hiragana @367-236-37
noback context `["ル"]%hiragana @367-256-37
noback context `["レ"]%hiragana @367-2356-37
noback context `["ロ"]%hiragana @367-356-37

noback context `["ワ"]%hiragana @367-7-37
noback context `["ヲ"]%hiragana @367-67-37
noback context `["ン"]%hiragana @367-678-37

noback context ["ウィ"]%hiragana @38-23-37
noback context ["ウェ"]%hiragana @38-235-37
noback context ["ウォ"]%hiragana @38-35-37
noback context ["キャ"]%hiragana @5-28-37
noback context ["キュ"]%hiragana @5-258-37
noback context ["キョ"]%hiragana @5-358-37
noback context ["ギャ"]%hiragana @56-28-37
noback context ["ギュ"]%hiragana @56-258-37
noback context ["ギョ"]%hiragana @56-358-37
noback context ["シャ"]%hiragana @5-268-37
noback context ["シュ"]%hiragana @5-2568-37
noback context ["ショ"]%hiragana @5-3568-37
noback context ["ジャ"]%hiragana @56-268-37
noback context ["ジュ"]%hiragana @56-2568-37
noback context ["ジョ"]%hiragana @56-3568-37
noback context ["シェ"]%hiragana @5-23568-37
noback context ["ジェ"]%hiragana @56-23568-37
noback context ["シャ"]~ @5-268-37
noback context ["シュ"]~ @5-2568-37
noback context ["ショ"]~ @5-3568-37
noback context ["ジャ"]~ @56-268-37
noback context ["ジュ"]~ @56-2568-37
noback context ["ジョ"]~ @56-3568-37
noback context ["シェ"]~ @5-23568-37
noback context ["ジェ"]~ @56-23568-37

noback context ["チャ"]%hiragana @5-267-37
noback context ["チュ"]%hiragana @5-2567-37
noback context ["チョ"]%hiragana @5-3567-37
noback context ["チェ"]%hiragana @5-23567-37
noback context ["ティ"]%hiragana @5-2367-37
noback context ["ディ"]%hiragana @56-2367-37
noback context ["トゥ"]%hiragana @38-2567-37
noback context ["ドゥ"]%hiragana @368-2567-37
noback context ["チャ"]~ @5-267-37
noback context ["チュ"]~ @5-2567-37
noback context ["チョ"]~ @5-3567-37
noback context ["チェ"]~ @5-23567-37
noback context ["ティ"]~ @5-2367-37
noback context ["ディ"]~ @56-2367-37
noback context ["トゥ"]~ @38-2567-37
noback context ["ドゥ"]~ @368-2567-37

noback context ["ニャ"]%hiragana @5-27-37
noback context ["ニュ"]%hiragana @5-257-37
noback context ["ニョ"]%hiragana @5-357-37
noback context ["ニャ"]~ @5-27-37
noback context ["ニュ"]~ @5-257-37
noback context ["ニョ"]~ @5-357-37
